Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2 Ballots and Supplies
2-5-219. Candidates nominated by write-in votes — Withdrawal of name.

Notwithstanding any other general law, or special act, or municipal charter to the contrary, no write-in candidate in a primary election for a position as a county or municipal official shall have such candidate's name placed upon the ballot in the election for such position unless such candidate received not less than twenty-five (25) votes.

If a candidate is nominated as prescribed in subsection (a) by write-in votes, such a nominated candidate may withdraw from the nomination by filing a letter of withdrawal with the county election commission not later than ten (10) days after the primary election wherein such candidate was nominated.

Acts 1982, ch. 607, §§ 1, 2.

Collateral References.

Challenges to Write-in Ballots and Certification of Write-in Candidates. 75 A.L.R.6th 311.

2-5-151. Petitions for recall, referendum or initiative.